dev/transliterate/cyr-lat1710.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

!%{İ%}
%{й%}
%{́ʼ%}
%{☭%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Exceptions ; ! not really active
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
в:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
з:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
й:й%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
к:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
м:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
п:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
с:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ч:ч%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ш:ш%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

һ:һ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ң:ң%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
қ:қ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ғ:ғ%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 


и:и%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
у:у%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

а:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
э:э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ә:ә%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
і:і AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ү:ү%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ұ:ұ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ө:ө%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
щ:ш%{́ʼ%}ш%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ю:%{й%}%{ʼ%}ю%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
я:%{й%}%{ʼ%}я AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
е:%{й%}%{ʼ%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:%{й%}%{ʼ%}ё AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

Б:Б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
В:В AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Г:Г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Д:Д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ж:Ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
З:З AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Й:Й%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
К:К AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Л:Л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
М:М AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Н:Н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
П:П AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Р:Р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
С:С AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Т:Т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ф:Ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Х:Х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ч:Ч%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ш:Ш%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ъ:Ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ь:Ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

Һ:Һ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ң:Ң%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Қ:Қ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ғ:Ғ%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 


И:И%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
У:У%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

А:А AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Э:Э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ы:Ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
О:О AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ә:Ә%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
І:І AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ү:Ү%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ұ:Ұ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ө:Ө%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

Ц:Тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Щ:Ш%{́ʼ%}Ш%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

Ю:%{й%}%{ʼ%}Ю%{́ʼ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Я:%{й%}%{ʼ%}Я AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Е:%{й%}%{ʼ%}Е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ё:%{й%}%{ʼ%}Ё AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 



!И:%{İ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ; 

LEXICON Exception

:%{☭%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.1" ; 

LEXICON Exceptions 

бульвар:бульвар Exception "weight: 0.1" ;
пунктуация:пунктуатси%{й%}я Exception "weight: 0.1" ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
